Hawaii statutes.
§516-6 Administration of chapter. The Hawaii housing finance and development corporation shall administer this chapter. [L 1967,
c 307, §7; HRS §516-6; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L 1997,
c 350, §14; am L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next